Georgia, session 2025_26, HB57.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Code Section 16-6-22 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to incest, is
amended by revising paragraph (4) of subsection (a) as follows:
"(4) Grandparent and grandchild of the whole blood or of the half blood or
step-grandparent and step-grandchild;"
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 57
- 1 -